Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1903
Foreclosure proceedings; confirmation of sale.

The foreclosure proceedings, provided by sections 77-1901 and 77-1902, shall be conducted as nearly as possible in the same manner, except in the following particulars: (1) In the foreclosure of a tax lien, as provided by section 77-1901, final confirmation of sale cannot be had until two years have expired from the date of the sale held by the sheriff in the foreclosure proceedings; or (2) in the foreclosure of a tax sale certificate or tax deed, as provided in section 77-1902, final confirmation of sale may be had immediately after the sheriff's sale.

Laws 1943, c. 176, § 3, p. 615;

R.S.1943, § 77-1903.

Confirmation cannot be had until expiration of two-year period, unless right to redeem is waived by owner or all persons having a legal interest in the land. County of Douglas v. Christensen, 144 Neb. 899, 15 N.W.2d 53 (1944).